test/src/morphology/noun-paradis_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - tjavelk: # GAHPER
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Nom: tjavelk
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Gen: tjavelga
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: tjavelgimme
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Acc: tjavelgav
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Ine: tjavelgin 
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Ill: tjavelgij
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Ela: tjavelgis
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Com: tjavelgijn 
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Nom: tjavelga
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Gen: tjavelgij
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Acc: tjavelgijt
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ine: tjavelgijn
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ill: tjavelgijda
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: tjavelgijdasihtte 
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ela: tjavelgijs
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Com: tjavelgij
    tjavelk+N+Ess: tjavelgin
    tjavelk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavelgasj
    tjavelk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavelgattjasj
    tjavelk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjavelgahtá
    tjavelk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: tjavelgahtes
    tjavelk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: tjavelgahtá
    tjavelk+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjavelk+N+Abe: []

  Noun - værált: # GAHPER
    værált+N+Sg+Nom: værált
    værált+N+Sg+Gen: værálda
    værált+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: væráldimme
    værált+N+Sg+Acc: væráldav
    værált+N+Sg+Ine: væráldin 
    værált+N+Sg+Ill: væráldij
    værált+N+Sg+Ela: væráldis
    værált+N+Sg+Com: væráldijn 
    værált+N+Pl+Nom: værálda
    værált+N+Pl+Gen: væráldij
    værált+N+Pl+Acc: væráldijt
    værált+N+Pl+Ine: væráldijn
    værált+N+Pl+Ill: væráldijda
    værált+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: væráldijdasihtte 
    værált+N+Pl+Ela: væráldijs
    værált+N+Pl+Com: væráldij
    værált+N+Ess: væráldin
    værált+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: væráldasj
    værált+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: væráldattjasj
    værált+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: væráldahtá
    værált+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: væráldahtes
    værált+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: væráldahtá
    værált+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    værált+N+Abe: []

  Noun - tjálos: # ÅRES
    tjálos+N+Sg+Nom: tjálos
    tjálos+N+Sg+Gen: tjállusa
    tjálos+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: tjállusimme
    tjálos+N+Sg+Acc: tjállusav
    tjálos+N+Sg+Ine: tjállusin 
    tjálos+N+Sg+Ill: tjállusij
    tjálos+N+Sg+Ela: tjállusis
    tjálos+N+Sg+Com: tjállusijn 
    tjálos+N+Pl+Nom: tjállusa
    tjálos+N+Pl+Gen: tjállusij
    tjálos+N+Pl+Acc: tjállusijt
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ine: tjállusijn
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ill: tjállusijda
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: tjállusijdasihtte 
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ela: tjállusijs
    tjálos+N+Pl+Com: tjállusij
    tjálos+N+Ess: tjállusin
    tjálos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjállusasj
    tjálos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjállusattjasj
    tjálos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjállusahtá
    tjálos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: tjállusahtes
    tjálos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: tjállusahtá
    tjálos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjálos+N+Abe: []

  Noun - julevsámegielak: # GAHPER
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielak
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Gen: julevsámegielaga
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: julevsámegielagimme
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Acc: julevsámegielagav
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Ine: julevsámegielagin 
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Ill: julevsámegielagij
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Ela: julevsámegielagis
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Com: julevsámegielagijn 
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Nom: julevsámegielaga
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Gen: julevsámegielagij
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Acc: julevsámegielagijt
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ine: julevsámegielagijn
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ill: julevsámegielagijda
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: julevsámegielagijdasihtte 
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ela: julevsámegielagijs
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Com: julevsámegielagij
    julevsámegielak+N+Ess: julevsámegielagin
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielagasj
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielagattjasj
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielagahtá
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: julevsámegielagahtes
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: julevsámegielagahtá
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    julevsámegielak+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gintal: # GÁMAS
    gintal+N+Sg+Nom: gintal
    gintal+N+Sg+Gen: ginntala
    gintal+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ginntalimme
    gintal+N+Sg+Acc: ginntalav
    gintal+N+Sg+Ine: ginntalin 
    gintal+N+Sg+Ill: ginntalij
    gintal+N+Sg+Ela: ginntalis
    gintal+N+Sg+Com: ginntalijn 
    gintal+N+Pl+Nom: ginntala
    gintal+N+Pl+Gen: ginntalij
    gintal+N+Pl+Acc: ginntalijt
    gintal+N+Pl+Ine: ginntalijn
    gintal+N+Pl+Ill: ginntalijda
    gintal+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: ginntalijdasihtte 
    gintal+N+Pl+Ela: ginntalijs
    gintal+N+Pl+Com: ginntalij
    gintal+N+Ess: ginntalin
    gintal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ginntalasj
    gintal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ginntalattjasj
    gintal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: ginntalahtá
    gintal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: ginntalahtes
    gintal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: ginntalahtá
    gintal+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gintal+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gahper: # GAHPER
    gahper+N+Sg+Nom: gahper
    gahper+N+Sg+Gen: gahpera
    gahper+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gahperimme
    gahper+N+Sg+Acc: gahperav
    gahper+N+Sg+Ine: gahperin 
    gahper+N+Sg+Ill: gahperij
    gahper+N+Sg+Ela: gahperis
    gahper+N+Sg+Com: gahperijn 
    gahper+N+Pl+Nom: gahpera
    gahper+N+Pl+Gen: gahperij
    gahper+N+Pl+Acc: gahperijt
    gahper+N+Pl+Ine: gahperijn
    gahper+N+Pl+Ill: gahperijda
    gahper+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gahperijdasihtte 
    gahper+N+Pl+Ela: gahperijs
    gahper+N+Pl+Com: gahperij
    gahper+N+Ess: gahperin
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahperasj
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahperattjasj
    gahper+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gahperahtá
    gahper+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gahperahtes
    gahper+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: gahperahtá
    gahper+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gahper+N+Abe: []

  Noun - nager: # ÅRES
    nager+N+Sg+Nom: nager
    nager+N+Sg+Gen: nahkára
    nager+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: nahkárimme
    nager+N+Sg+Acc: nahkárav
    nager+N+Sg+Ine: nahkárin 
    nager+N+Sg+Ill: nahkárij
    nager+N+Sg+Ela: nahkáris
    nager+N+Sg+Com: nahkárijn 
    nager+N+Pl+Nom: nahkára
    nager+N+Pl+Gen: nahkárij
    nager+N+Pl+Acc: nahkárijt
    nager+N+Pl+Ine: nahkárijn
    nager+N+Pl+Ill: nahkárijda
    nager+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: nahkárijdasihtte 
    nager+N+Pl+Ela: nahkárijs
    nager+N+Pl+Com: nahkárij
    nager+N+Ess: nahkárin
    nager+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: nahkárasj
    nager+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: nahkárattjasj
    nager+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: nahkárahtá
    nager+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: nahkárahtes
    nager+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: nahkárahtá
    nager+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    nager+N+Abe: []

  Noun - áhkásj: # GAHPER
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Nom: áhkásj
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Gen: áhkátja
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: áhkátjimme
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Acc: áhkátjav
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Ine: áhkátjin 
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Ill: áhkátjij
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Ela: áhkátjis
    áhkásj+N+Sg+Com: áhkátjijn 
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Nom: áhkátja
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Gen: áhkátjij
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Acc: áhkátjijt
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Ine: áhkátjijn
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Ill: áhkátjijda
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: áhkátjijdasihtte 
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Ela: áhkátjijs
    áhkásj+N+Pl+Com: áhkátjij
    áhkásj+N+Ess: áhkátjin
    áhkásj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: áhkátjasj
    áhkásj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: áhkátjattjasj
    áhkásj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: áhkátjahtá
    áhkásj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: áhkátjahtes
    áhkásj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: áhkátjahtá
    áhkásj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    áhkásj+N+Abe: []

  Noun - iehket: # GAHPER
    iehket+N+Sg+Nom: iehket
    iehket+N+Sg+Gen: iehkeda
    iehket+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: iehkedimme
    iehket+N+Sg+Acc: iehkedav
    iehket+N+Sg+Ine: iehkedin 
    iehket+N+Sg+Ill: iehkedij
    iehket+N+Sg+Ela: iehkedis
    iehket+N+Sg+Com: iehkedijn 
    iehket+N+Pl+Nom: iehkeda
    iehket+N+Pl+Gen: iehkedij
    iehket+N+Pl+Acc: iehkedijt
    iehket+N+Pl+Ine: iehkedijn
    iehket+N+Pl+Ill: iehkedijda
    iehket+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: iehkedijdasihtte 
    iehket+N+Pl+Ela: iehkedijs
    iehket+N+Pl+Com: iehkedij
    iehket+N+Ess: iehkedin
    iehket+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: iehkedasj
    iehket+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: iehkedattjasj
    iehket+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: iehkedahtá
    iehket+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: iehkedahtes
    iehket+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: iehkedahtá
    iehket+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    iehket+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gierkav: # GÁMAS
    gierkav+N+Sg+Nom: gierkav
    gierkav+N+Sg+Gen: gierkkama
    gierkav+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gierkkamimme
    gierkav+N+Sg+Acc: gierkkamav
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ine: gierkkamin 
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ill: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ela: gierkkamis
    gierkav+N+Sg+Com: gierkkamijn 
    gierkav+N+Pl+Nom: gierkkama
    gierkav+N+Pl+Gen: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Pl+Acc: gierkkamijt
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ine: gierkkamijn
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ill: gierkkamijda
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gierkkamijdasihtte 
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ela: gierkkamijs
    gierkav+N+Pl+Com: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Ess: gierkkamin
    gierkav+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gierkkamasj
    gierkav+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gierkkamattjasj
    gierkav+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gierkkamahtá
    gierkav+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gierkkamahtes
    gierkav+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: gierkkamahtá
    gierkav+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gierkav+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gieles: # ÅRES
    gieles+N+Sg+Nom: gieles
    gieles+N+Sg+Gen: gællása
    gieles+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gællásimme
    gieles+N+Sg+Acc: gællásav
    gieles+N+Sg+Ine: gællásin 
    gieles+N+Sg+Ill: gællásij
    gieles+N+Sg+Ela: gællásis
    gieles+N+Sg+Com: gællásijn 
    gieles+N+Pl+Nom: gællása
    gieles+N+Pl+Gen: gællásij
    gieles+N+Pl+Acc: gællásijt
    gieles+N+Pl+Ine: gællásijn
    gieles+N+Pl+Ill: gællásijda
    gieles+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gællásijdasihtte 
    gieles+N+Pl+Ela: gællásijs
    gieles+N+Pl+Com: gællásij
    gieles+N+Ess: gællásin
    gieles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gællásasj
    gieles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gællásattjasj
    gieles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gællásahtá
    gieles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gællásahtes
    gieles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: gællásahtá
    gieles+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gieles+N+Abe: []

  Noun - lågos: # ÅRES
    lågos+N+Sg+Nom: lågos
    lågos+N+Sg+Gen: låhkusa
    lågos+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: låhkusimme
    lågos+N+Sg+Acc: låhkusav
    lågos+N+Sg+Ine: låhkusin 
    lågos+N+Sg+Ill: låhkusij
    lågos+N+Sg+Ela: låhkusis
    lågos+N+Sg+Com: låhkusijn 
    lågos+N+Pl+Nom: låhkusa
    lågos+N+Pl+Gen: låhkusij
    lågos+N+Pl+Acc: låhkusijt
    lågos+N+Pl+Ine: låhkusijn
    lågos+N+Pl+Ill: låhkusijda
    lågos+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: låhkusijdasihtte 
    lågos+N+Pl+Ela: låhkusijs
    lågos+N+Pl+Com: låhkusij
    lågos+N+Ess: låhkusin
    lågos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: låhkusasj
    lågos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: låhkusattjasj
    lågos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: låhkusahtá
    lågos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: låhkusahtes
    lågos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: låhkusahtá
    lågos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    lågos+N+Abe: []

  Noun - vieroj: # GAHPER
    vieroj+N+Sg+Nom: vieroj
    vieroj+N+Sg+Gen: vierruha
    vieroj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: vierruhimme
    vieroj+N+Sg+Acc: vierruhav
    vieroj+N+Sg+Ine: vierruhin 
    vieroj+N+Sg+Ill: vierruhij
    vieroj+N+Sg+Ela: vierruhis
    vieroj+N+Sg+Com: vierruhijn 
    vieroj+N+Pl+Nom: vierruha
    vieroj+N+Pl+Gen: vierruhij
    vieroj+N+Pl+Acc: vierruhijt
    vieroj+N+Pl+Ine: vierruhijn
    vieroj+N+Pl+Ill: vierruhijda
    vieroj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vierruhijdasihtte 
    vieroj+N+Pl+Ela: vierruhijs
    vieroj+N+Pl+Com: vierruhij
    vieroj+N+Ess: vierruhin
    vieroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vierruhasj
    vieroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vierruhattjasj
    vieroj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: vierruhahtá
    vieroj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: vierruhahtes
    vieroj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: vierruhahtá
    vieroj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vieroj+N+Abe: []
